Utah statutes.
63B-18-201.   Revenue bond authorizations -- State Building Ownership
Authority.
(1)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B,
Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or
execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease-purchase agreement
in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $3,800,000
for the acquisition of property in the Salt Lake City, Utah area on which to
construct a Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control warehouse expansion,
together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay
capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements; and
(b)  the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control use increased sales revenues
as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under
authority of this section.
(2)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B,
Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or
execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease-purchase agreement
in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $19,904,000
for the construction of a warehouse expansion for the Department of Alcoholic
Beverage Control, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of
issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve
requirements;
(b)  the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control use increased sales revenues
as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under
authority of this section; and
(c)  the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may request operation and
maintenance funding from sales revenues.
